Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.150

Tax title property—City may acquire from county before resale.

If property is struck off to or bid in by a county at a sale for general taxes, and is subject to local improvement assessments in any city or town, or has been taken over by the city or town on the foreclosure of local improvement assessments, the city or town may acquire the property from the county at any time before resale and receive a deed therefor upon paying the face of such taxes and costs, without penalty or interest.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.49.150. Prior: 1929 c 143 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 170 s 1, part; 1911 c 98 s 40, part; RRS s 9393, part.]